Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB440.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 29A.170 is amended to read as follows:
(1) All jurors in Circuit and District Court shall be paid:
(a) Fifteen[five] dollars ($15)[($5)] per day for jury service;[.]
(b) An additional fifteen dollars ($15) per day for each day that jurors are kept
overnight or otherwise sequestered when ordered to do so by the judge of
the court for which the jurors were summoned; and
(c) [In addition thereto, they shall be paid ]Seven dollars and fifty cents ($7.50)
per day as reimbursement of expenses incurred, which sum is hereby
determined to be the equivalent of the minimum daily expenses reasonably to
be incurred by such juror.
(2) Persons who appear in court in response to a summons for jury duty and who are
not relieved from jury service shall receive full compensation for each day they are
required to be and are in attendance, even though they are not sworn or accepted for
jury service.
Section 2. KRS 32.011 is amended to read as follows:
This Chapter[Nothing contained in KRS 32.011 to 32.070] shall not be construed as
limiting, restricting, or terminating the authority of local governmental units, including
cities, counties, charter county governments, consolidated local governments, unified
local governments, and urban-county governments, to provide or supplement financial
support for the court system and the offices of the Commonwealth's attorneys which are
serving that local community[, and all such units of local government are further
authorized to supplement the financial support provided thereto by the state under KRS
32.011 to 32.070].
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 1/16/2026 12:47 PM Jacketed